Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1192.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Section 32-1421, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-1421. Exemptions from licensing requirements; definition A. This article does not apply to any person while engaged in: 1. The provision of medical assistance in case of an emergency. 2. The administration of family remedies, including the sale of vitamins, health foods or health food supplements or any other natural remedies, except drugs or medicines for which an authorized prescription is required by law. 3. The practice of religion, treatment by prayer or the laying on of hands as a religious rite or ordinance. 4. The practice of any of the healing arts of and by Indian tribes in this state. 5. The lawful practice of any of the healing arts to the extent authorized by a license issued by this state. 6. Activities or functions that do not require the exercise of a doctor of medicine's judgment for their performance, that are not in violation of the laws of this state and that are usually or customarily delegated by a doctor of medicine under the doctor's doctor of medicine's direction or supervision or that are performed in accordance with the approval of a committee of physicians in a licensed health care institution. 7. The official duties of a medical officer in the armed forces of the United States, the United States department of veterans affairs or the United States public health service, or their successor agencies, if the duties are restricted to federal lands. 8. Any act, task or function competently performed by a physician assistant in the proper performance of the physician assistant's duties. 9. The emergency harvesting of donor organs by a doctor of medicine or team of doctors of medicine licensed to practice medicine in another state or country for use in another state or country. 10. Providing basic first aid in good faith and without compensation to an injured person if THE person ADMINISTERING THE BASIC FIRST AID OBTAINS THE INJURED PERsON'S CONSENT BEFORE RENDERING ASSISTANCE.  iF THE INJURED PERSON IS under fifteen years of age, CONSENT MUST BE OBTAINED FROM A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN. If the person administering the basic first aid determines that the injured person is under fifteen years of age, the person must notify law enforcement of the injured person's condition. B. This article does not apply to: 1. A doctor of medicine residing in another jurisdiction who is authorized to practice medicine in that jurisdiction, if the doctor engages in actual single or infrequent consultation with a doctor of medicine who is licensed in this state and if the consultation regards a specific patient or patients. 2. A doctor of medicine who is licensed to practice in another jurisdiction if the doctor engages in the practice of medicine that is limited to patients with whom the doctor has an already established doctor-patient relationship and who reside outside this jurisdiction when both the doctor and the patient are physically in this state for not more than sixty consecutive days. For the purposes of this paragraph, "patient" means a person who is not a resident of this state and who is an athlete or a professional entertainer. C. this section does not limit any liability protections that are provided in section 32-1471. D. For the purposes of this section, "basic first aid": 1. Means any of the following: (a) Cleaning minor cuts, scrapes or scratches. (b) Treating a minor burn. (c) Applying bandages and dressings. (d) Providing fluids to relieve heat stress. 2. Includes administering antiseptics or topical ointments, creams or analgesics and, if requested, providing nonprescription pain-relieving medication for the purpose of treating the ailments specified in paragraph 1 of this subsection. END_STATUTE